Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4301
Act, how cited.

Sections 2-4301 to 2-4327 shall be known and may be cited as the Agricultural Liming Materials Act.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 871, § 26.